Connecticut, session 2026, HB05526.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) If and when the state of
New York, the state of Massachusetts or the state of Rhode Island, as
applicable, enacts a similar law granting reciprocal privileges to
residents of this state, any person who holds a license to fish in inland
waters in the state of New York, the state of Massachusetts or the state
of Rhode Island, as applicable, may fish in any inland waters in this state
without a nonresident inland waters license to fish as required by title
26 of the general statutes, provided such nonresidents shall be subject to
all other provisions of the general statutes and the regulations of the
commissioner relating to fishing in lakes and ponds.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
The phrase "as applicable" was added for purposes of clarity.
ENV Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 1 of 1